Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 279.10, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: The board of directors of a school district and the authorities in charge of an accredited nonpublic school may apply to the department of education for authorization to maintain a year-round school calendar at an attendance center or school for students in prekindergarten through grade eight twelve . However, a board shall hold a public hearing on any proposal relating to authorization for a year-round House File 392, p. 2 school calendar prior to submitting an application under this subsection to the department of education for approval. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 392, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor